zh-CN: 压力测量单位: 巴 (bar); 英寸汞柱 (inHg); 千克每平方厘米 (kg/cm²); 千帕 (kPa); 兆帕 (MPa); 毫米汞柱 (mmHg); 磅/平方英寸 (psi); 其他
fr: Unité de mesure de la pression: bars (bar); pouces de mercure (inHg); kilogrammes par centimètre carré (kg/cm²); kilopascals (kPa); mégapascals (MPa); millimètres de mercure (mmHg); livres par pouce carré (psi); Autre
sl-SI: Merilna enota za tlak: bari (bar); palci živega srebra (inHg); kilogrami na kvadratni centimeter (kg/cm²); kilopaskali (kPa); megapaskali (MPa); milimetri živega srebra (mmHg); funti na kvadratni palec (psi); Drugo
ro-RO: Unitate de măsurare a presiunii: bari (bar); inchi de mercur (inHg); kilograme pe centimetru pătrat (kg/cm²); kilopascali (kPa); megapascali (MPa); milimetri de mercur (mmHg); livre pe inch pătrat (psi); Altele
sv: Tryckenhet: bar (bar); tum kvicksilver (inHg); kilogram per kvadratcentimeter (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); millimeter kvicksilver (mmHg); pund per kvadrattum (psi); Övrigt
ko: 압력 측정 단위: 바(bar); 수은주 인치(inHg); 제곱센티미터당 킬로그램(kg/cm²); 킬로파스칼(kPa); 메가파스칼(MPa); 수은주 밀리미터(mmHg); 제곱인치당 파운드(psi); 기타
en: Pressure measurement unit: bars (bar); inches of mercury (inHg); kilograms per square centimeter (kg/cm²); kilopascals (kPa); megapascals (MPa); millimeters of mercury (mmHg); pounds per square inch (psi); Other
ja: 圧力測定ユニット: バール (bar); 水銀柱インチ (inHg); キログラム毎平方センチメートル (kg/cm²); キロパスカル (kPa); メガパスカル (MPa); 水銀柱ミリメートル (mmHg); 重量ポンド毎平方インチ (psi); その他
pl: Jednostka pomiaru ciśnienia: bary (bar); cale słupa rtęci (inHg); kilogramy na centymetr kwadratowy (kg/cm²); kilopaskale (kPa); megapaskale (MPa); milimetry słupa rtęci (mmHg); funty na cal kwadratowy (psi); Inne
ru: Единица измерения давления: бары (бар); дюймы ртутного столба (inHg); килограммы на квадратный сантиметр (кг/см²); килопаскали (кПа); мегапаскали (МПа); миллиметры ртутного столба (мм рт. ст.); фунты на квадратный дюйм (psi); Другое
cs: Jednotka pro měření tlaku: bary (bar); palce sloupce rtuti (inHg); kilogramy na centimetr čtvereční (kg/cm²); kilopascaly (kPa); megapascaly (MPa); milimetry rtuťového sloupce (mmHg); libry na čtvereční palec (psi); Ostatní
vi: Đơn vị đo áp suất: bar (bar); inch thủy ngân (inHg); kilôgam trên centimet vuông (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); milimét thủy ngân (mmHg); pound trên inch vuông (psi); Khác
sk-SK: Jednotka merania tlaku: bary (bar); palce ortuťového stĺpca (inHg); kilogramy na centimeter štvorcový (kg/cm²); kilopascaly (kPa); megapascaly (MPa); milimetre ortuťového stĺpca (mmHg); libry na palec štvorcový (psi); Iné
el: Μονάδα μέτρησης πίεσης: bars (bar); ίντσες στήλης υδραργύρου (inHg); κιλά ανά τετραγωνικό εκατοστό (kg/cm²); κιλοπασκάλ (kPa); μεγαπασκάλ (MPa); χιλιοστά στήλης υδραργύρου (mmHg); λίβρες ανά τετραγωνική ίντσα (psi); Άλλο
pt-PT: Unidade de medição de pressão: Bares (bar); Polegadas de mercúrio (inHg); Quilogramas por centímetro quadrado (kg/cm²); Quilopascais (kPa); megapascais (MPa); milímetros de mercúrio (mmHg); libras por polegada quadrada (psi); Outro
hr-HR: Jedinica za mjerenje tlaka: bar (bar); inči žive (inHg); kilogrami po kvadratnom centimetru (kg/cm²); kilopaskali (kPa); megapaskali (MPa); milimetri žive (mmHg); funte po kvadratnom inču (psi); Ostalo
nb: Trykkmåleenhet: bar (bar); tommer kvikksølv (inHg); kilo per kvadratcentimeter (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); millimeter kvikksølv (mmHg); pund per kvadrattomme (psi); Annet
tr: Basınç ölçüm birimi: bar (bar); inç cıva (inHg); santimetrekare başına kilogram (kg/cm²); kilopaskal (kPa); Megapaskal (MPa); Milimetre cıva (mmHg); İnç kare başına libre (psi); Diğer
it: Unità di misura della pressione: bar (bar); pollici di mercurio (inHg); chilogrammi per centimetro quadrato (kg/cm²); chilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); millimetri di mercurio (mmHg); libbre per pollice quadrato (psi); Altro
fi: Paineen mittayksikkö: baari (bar); elohopeatuuma (inHg); kilogramma neliösenttimetriä kohti (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); Megapascal (MPa); Elohopeamillimetri (mmHg); Paunaa neliötuumaa kohti (psi); Muu
de: Druckmesseinheit: Bar (bar); Zoll Quecksilbersäule (inHg); Kilogramm pro Quadratzentimeter (kg/cm²); Kilopascal (kPa); Megapascal (MPa); Millimeter Quecksilbersäule (mmHg); Pfund pro Quadratzoll (psi); Sonstige
th: หน่วยวัดความดัน: บาร์ (bar); นิ้วปรอท (inHg); กิโลกรัมต่อตารางเซนติเมตร (kg/cm²); กิโลปาสกาล (kPa); เมกะปาสกาล (MPa); มิลลิเมตรปรอท (mmHg); ปอนด์ต่อตารางนิ้ว (psi); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Slėgio matavimo vienetas: barai (bar); gyvsidabrio stulpelio coliai (inHg); kilogramai kvadratiniam centimetrui (kg/cm²); kilopaskaliai (kPa); megapaskaliai (MPa); gyvsidabrio stulpelio milimetrai (mmHg); svarai kvadratiniam coliui (psi); Kita
es: Unidad de medición de presión: bares (bar); pulgadas de mercurio (inHg); kilogramos por centímetro cuadrado (kg/cm²); kilopascales (kPa); Megapascales (MPa); Milímetros de mercurio (mmHg); Libras por pulgada cuadrada (psi); Otro
nl: Drukmeeteenheid: bar (bar); inches kwik (inHg); kilogram per vierkante centimeter (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); millimeter kwik (mmHg); pounds per square inch (psi); Anders
hu: Nyomásmérési egység: bar (bar); higanyhüvelyk (inHg); kilogramm per négyzetcentiméter (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); higanymilliméter (mmHg); font/négyzethüvelyk (psi); Egyéb
bg-BG: Мерна единица за налягане: барове (bar); инчове живачен стълб (inHg); килограми на квадратен сантиметър (kg/cm²); килопаскали (kPa); мегапаскали (MPa); милиметри живачен стълб (mmHg); паунди на квадратен инч (psi); Друго
da: Trykmåleenhed: bar (bar); tommer kviksølv (inHg); kilogram pr. kvadratcentimeter (kg/cm²); kilopascal (kPa); megapascal (MPa); millimeter kviksølv (mmHg); pund pr. kvadrattomme (psi); Anden
pt-BR: Unidade de medição de pressão: bar (bar); polegadas de mercúrio (inHg); quilogramas por centímetro quadrado (kg/cm²); quilopascais (kPa); megapascals (MPa); milímetros de mercúrio (mmHg); libras por polegada quadrada (psi); Outro
zh-TW: 壓力測量單位: 巴 (bar); 英寸汞柱 (inHg); 每平方公分公斤重 (kg/cm²); 千帕 (kPa); 百萬帕斯卡 (MPa); 毫米汞柱 (mmHg); 磅/平方英吋 (psi); 其他